Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6006YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2157 Section 1. Section 717B.8, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. The delivery of a cat or dog to an animal shelter or 3 pound as defined in section 162.2 that has been issued or 4 renewed a valid authorization by the department under chapter 5 162 . Delivery under this paragraph requires an employee or 6 volunteer of the animal shelter or pound to physically accept 7 the delivery of the animal. 8